Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-2708
Local sources of revenue, defined.

Local sources of revenue means the city's property tax, the city's local option sales tax, or any other general tax levied by the city or generated from municipally owned utilities or grants, donations, or state and federal funds received by the city subject to any restrictions of the grantor, donor, or state or federal law. Funds generated from municipally owned utilities shall be used for utility-related purposes or activities associated with the economic development program as determined by the governing body, including, but not limited to, load management, energy efficiency, energy conservation, incentives for load growth, line extensions, land purchase, site development, and demand side management measures.

Laws 1991, LB 840, § 9;

Laws 2011, LB471, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 191.
August 28, 2021